California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(2) The benefit table described in paragraph (1) shall be issued annually and based on all of the following:

(A) The projected number of households described in subdivision (b).

(B) The size of households described in subdivision (b), as determined when the previously excluded individual was added to the household pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 18900.5.

(C) The number of previously excluded individuals added to the household pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 18900.5.

(D) The total funding appropriated for purposes of this section in the annual Budget Act.

(d) SNB
 provided pursuant to this section shall be delivered on a monthly basis through the electronic benefits transfer system created pursuant to Section 10072, in the same manner as CalFresh benefits, and, to the extent permitted by federal law, shall not be considered income for any means-tested program.

(e) SNB shall be provided to the household if the household continues to receive CalFresh benefits, and includes the individual added to the household pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 18900.5.

(f) A household whose CalFresh benefits are restored, consistent with current law governing CalFresh, following discontinuance for failure to provide the necessary documentation or information required to determine continuing eligibility, shall also have their SNB restored, without proration, back to the original date of discontinuance of the CalFresh benefits. If a
 household is discontinued for any other reason and reapplies for benefits, the supplemental benefit provisions outlined in this section shall not apply.

(g) A household that is eligible for and receives SNB under this section shall not at any point be eligible for transitional nutrition benefits as created in Section 18900.7, regardless of a change in household circumstances.

(h) The department shall develop client notices for the SNB program, as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 27, Sec. 118.   (SB 80)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18900.7.

(a) There is hereby created the SSI/SSP Cash-In Transitional Nutrition Benefit (TNB) Program.

(b) The department shall use state funds appropriated for this program to provide transitional nutrition benefits to former CalFresh households that were eligible for and receiving CalFresh benefits as of June 1, 2019, or the alternate implementation date described in subdivision (b) of Section 18900.5, but became ineligible for CalFresh benefits when a previously excluded individual receiving Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment Program benefits provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3 was added to the household pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 18900.5.

(c) (1) The amount of TNB provided to each household shall be based on a TNB table developed by the department.

(2) The benefit table described in paragraph (1) shall be issued annually and be based on all of the following:

(A) The projected number of households described in subdivision (b).

(B) Household size as determined when the previously excluded individual was added to the household pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 18900.5.

(C) The number of previously excluded individuals added to the household pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 18900.5.

(D) The total
 funding appropriated for purposes of this section in the annual Budget Act.

(d) TNB provided pursuant to this section shall be delivered through the electronic benefits transfer system created pursuant to Section 10072, and, to the extent permitted by federal law, shall not be considered income for any means-tested program.

(e) A household that is eligible for TNB shall be initially certified for one 12-month period and may be recertified for additional 12-month periods through a recertification process developed by the department, following consultation with counties and stakeholders, if the household continues to meet all of the following criteria:

(1) The household includes at least one individual added to the household pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 18900.5.

(2) This individual continues to receive Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment Program benefits provided in Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3.

(3) This individual remains ineligible for CalFresh benefits.

(f) The department shall develop client notices for the TNB program, as appropriate.

(g) (1) If a household is discontinued for failure to provide the documentation or information required
 to determine continuing eligibility for TNB, the benefits shall be restored, without proration, back to the original date of discontinuance of TNB, if all documentation and information required to determine continuing eligibility is provided to the county within 90 days of the date of discontinuance from TNB. If the household is discontinued for any other reason and reapplies for benefits, the transitional benefit provisions outlined in this section shall not apply.

(2) The department, in consultation with representatives of county human services agencies and the County Welfare Directors Association of California, shall develop and implement a process that maintains
 eligibility for all beneficiaries of benefits provided under this section for two years by pausing the discontinuances described in paragraph (1) and marking all recertifications as complete. The pause shall take effect as soon as possible after the effective date of the act that added this paragraph, and shall continue for two years from the commencement of the pause, or until the department notifies the Legislature that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the necessary automation to implement subdivision (e), whichever date is later.

(h) Households that are eligible for and receive TNB under this section shall not at any point be eligible for supplemental nutrition benefits, as created in Section 18900.6, regardless of a change in household circumstances.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 79.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

18900.8.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall work with representatives of county human services agencies and the County Welfare Directors Association of California to update the budgeting methodology used to determine the annual funding for county administration of the CalFresh program beginning with the 2023–24 fiscal year. As part of the process of updating the budgeting methodology, the ongoing workload and costs to counties, including, but not limited to, expanding the CalFresh program to recipients of Supplemental Security Income and State Supplementary Payment Program benefits shall be examined.

(b) The costs of county operations used in the budgeting methodology developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be reviewed by the department for the
 2027–28 fiscal year and every third fiscal year thereafter. The department shall provide information to the legislative budget committees regarding this review and how it may impact county administrative costs as part of the budget proposed by either January 10 or May 14 of any year prior to the fiscal year for which this provision applies.

(c) In implementing this section, the department shall consult legislative staff, representatives of county human services agencies and the County Welfare Directors Association of California, advocate representatives, and labor organizations that represent county workers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 57.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

18900.9.

Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may do both of the following:

(a) Implement all waivers approved by the United States Secretary of Agriculture for a period of less than 24 months through all-county letters or similar instructions.

(b) Implement all waivers approved by the United States Secretary of Agriculture for a period of 24 months or longer through all-county letters or similar instructions until regulations are adopted, which shall occur no later than 24 months after implementation occurs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 85, Sec. 81.   (AB 135)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

18900.95.

(a) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section that California’s state cost share for CalFresh benefits pursuant to Section 10105 of Public Law 119-21 (7 U.S.C. Sec. 2013(a)) be reduced to the greatest extent possible by reducing the CalFresh payment error rate to the greatest extent possible.

(2) It is further the intent of the Legislature that these efforts shall mitigate adverse impacts or restrictions for CalFresh applicants or recipients, and shall not result in a reduction in the eligible population accessing benefits, so as not to cause increased hunger for the population served by this program to the maximum extent possible. It is further the intent of the Legislature to reduce
 administrative burden and improve the client experience.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the State Department of Social Services may, until October 1, 2027, and when necessary to reduce the CalFresh payment error rate, implement and administer the CalFresh program by means of all-county letters and emergency regulations. The department may readopt any emergency regulation authorized by this section that is the same as, or substantially equivalent to, an emergency regulation previously adopted under this section. All-county letters and emergency regulations adopted under this section shall not impede or reduce an applicant’s or recipient’s access to benefits, or benefits themselves, for which they are eligible under this chapter.

(2) The initial adoption of emergency regulations pursuant to this section and one readoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be exempt from review by the Office of Administrative Law. The initial emergency regulations and the one readoption of emergency regulations authorized by this section shall be shared with the County Welfare Directors Association of California (CWDA), the exclusive representatives of CalFresh eligibility workers, advocates for program applicants and recipients, and legislative staff for review and feedback. Upon consideration of stakeholder review and feedback, the emergency regulations shall then be submitted to the Office of Administrative Law for filing with the Secretary of State and each
 shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days, by which time final regulations shall be adopted. The consultative process for review and feedback required by this paragraph shall also apply to all-county letters adopted pursuant to this section.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, an agreement between the department and any entity that is entered into for the purpose of this section and that is executed prior to October 1, 2027, shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the Public Contract Code, and the State Contracting Manual, and shall not be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services or the Department of Technology.

(d) The department shall engage in stakeholder consultation starting in September 2025 and continuing through the duration of the
 multiyear activities pursuant to this section and with any funding appropriated for this purpose in the state budget. This engagement shall include the California Statewide Automated Welfare System, CWDA, the exclusive representatives of CalFresh eligibility workers, advocates for program applicants and recipients, and legislative staff.

(e) Beginning in November 2025 through November 2027, the department shall update the Legislature on a quarterly basis on the implementation of the multiyear activities pursuant to this section and with any funding appropriated for this purpose in the state budget. These updates shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:

(1) Emergency regulations developed by the department pursuant to this section.

(2) Contracts entered into pursuant to subdivision (c),
 including contract amounts, general purposes, timelines, and when available, outcomes.

(3) New methods utilized to verify incomes, any methods that have been attempted and discontinued, and the number of individuals who are utilizing or have opted not to use new verification tools. For CalFresh recipients whose income cannot be verified using existing methods, the department shall provide a summary of new methods used to verify income, including a description of the type of income, any concerns raised about those verification methods, and any changes in practice to mitigate those concerns.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 107, Sec. 8.   (SB 146)   Effective September 17, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18900.96.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to provide direction to the state and counties to maximize efforts to retain in the program as many eligible CalFresh recipients as possible as Public Law 119-21 is implemented. It is further the intent of the Legislature to provide for the continuation of food benefits for as many Californians as possible who may become ineligible for CalFresh benefits due to the enactment of Public Law 119-21.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to implement Public Law 119-21 using all of the following principles:

(1) Mitigate harm and minimize client impacts and discontinuances of benefits whenever possible.

(2) Use data and research to inform decisions, monitor impacts, and make adjustments when necessary. This step includes, but is not limited to, using administrative data to streamline the verification of compliance with, and exemptions from, the CalFresh time limit and corresponding able-bodied adult without dependents (ABAWD) work requirements whenever possible.

(3) Consult with affected groups to obtain input and feedback, including, but not limited to, current and former CalFresh recipients, counties, the County Welfare Directors Association of California, representatives of county eligibility workers, community-based organizations, and advocates.

(4) Identify opportunities to improve existing processes in parallel with implementation efforts that center client and county user experience.

(5) To the maximum extent possible, support operational readiness to implement Public Law 119-21, including timely policy guidance, system automation, and the provision of county training and technical assistance.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature, to the extent permitted by federal law and to the extent relevant administrative data are available, that the department shall, working with other state departments and the California Health and Human Services Agency, as necessary, adopt, provide instructions to counties on, and streamline the verification of, exemptions based on available administrative data for the populations listed in paragraphs (1) through (4) and others identified by the department. The department shall not infringe on, or impede, the ability of individuals to work or continue working.

(1) Individuals served under the Lanterman Developmental Disabilities Services Act (Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 4500)) by regional centers.

(2) Recipients of in-home supportive services under Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3 of Part 3 and their caregiver providers.

(3) Individuals who meet the CalFresh definition of homelessness or chronic homelessness if the county welfare department has also determined that the individual suffers from obvious physical or mental unfitness for work.

(4) (A) Individuals 24 years of age or younger who are, or were upon attaining 18 years of age, in foster care under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court as a dependent pursuant to Section 300, as a ward pursuant to Section 601 or 602, or as a transition dependent
 pursuant to Section 450, and who are unfit for work due to a documented behavioral or physical health condition as indicated in their case plan, medical billing claims data, or other appropriate documentation. This may include, but is not limited to, the following:

(i) Nonminor dependents, as defined in subdivision (v) of Section 11400, who remain in extended foster care and meet participation requirements pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.

(ii) Nonminor former dependents or wards, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (aa) of Section 11400, who previously participated in the extended foster care program and met the participation requirements pursuant to paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 11403 and the qualifying medical condition has not resolved.

(iii) Individuals who were
 in foster care under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court at 18 years of age or older and who are eligible to receive full-scope Medi-Cal benefits until 26 years of age, with a documented, qualifying medical condition.

(B) This paragraph shall become operative on the date when the department notifies the Legislature that a process has been established to provide administrative data to the California Statewide Automated Welfare System, and that the necessary changes have been automated to implement this paragraph.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that all exemptions to the ABAWD work requirements provided by the state and the counties under Public Law 119-21 shall, to the extent permitted by federal law and guidance, remain in effect for any recipient until, at the earliest, the next scheduled redetermination for that recipient, when the exemption shall be reassessed by
 the county, unless the automated exemption at redetermination allows for the exemption to continue.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that a recipient shall not be discontinued from the CalFresh program due to the ABAWD work requirements under Public Law 119-21 in California before October 1, 2026, or until both of the following administrative activities are complete, whichever is later:

(1) Completion of all automation necessary for the initial implementation of Public Law 119-21. This shall not preclude future additional automation and enhancements to streamline and support the ability of counties to support CalFresh applicants and recipients.

(2) Completion of functionality in the California Statewide Automated Welfare System necessary to support automated exemptions as identified by the state. This shall
 not preclude future additional automation and enhancements to streamline and support the automated exemption processes.

(f) (1) Unless the state is under a statewide waiver of the ABAWD time limit and corresponding work requirements, the department shall provide data on at least a semiannual basis to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature and all 58 county welfare departments, starting on January 15, 2027, on the total number of CalFresh recipients subject to, exempted from, or discontinued from the program potentially due to, the CalFresh ABAWD time limit and corresponding work requirements. The data, which shall not include personally identifiable information, shall also include information, as available, on the characteristics of individuals who may have lost CalFresh as a result of the time limit, including, but not limited to, demographic data about the individuals, and impacted households as
 appropriate, and, when applicable, explain the implementation of major new sources of administrative data supporting the verification of exemptions. The department shall develop the methodology in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California. Prior to the first two reports, the data shall be furnished to impacted counties with a minimum of four weeks for review prior to public reporting in order to ensure accuracy.

(2) The department shall follow all applicable data-deidentification guidelines to prevent the reidentification of recipients described in this subdivision.

(g) (1) In addition to the populations identified in subdivision (f), the department shall provide data on at least a semiannual basis to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature and all 58 county welfare departments, starting on January 15,
 2027, and until all relevant households have been discontinued from the CalFresh program, on the total number of CalFresh recipients discontinued from the program due to all other provisions of Public Law 119-21, including, but not limited to, the person’s immigration status under Public Law 119-21. The data, which shall not include personally identifiable information, shall also include as much detail as possible on the characteristics of persons discontinued from the CalFresh program as a result of Public Law 119-21, including, but not limited to, the reason for discontinuance and demographic data about the discontinued person and the other persons in their household, both of which shall be reported at the individual and household level.

(2) The department shall follow all applicable data-deidentification guidelines to prevent the reidentification of recipients described in this subdivision.

(h) (1) The department, in collaboration with other departments and the California Health and Human Services Agency, as necessary, shall adopt, provide instructions to counties on, and automate for, compliance with CalFresh work requirements, in accordance with federal law, for individuals participating in extended foster care and who have been determined to be working at least 80 hours per month pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 11403.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall become operative on the date when the department notifies the Legislature both that a process has been established to provide the data to the California Statewide Automated Welfare System and that the necessary changes have been automated to implement paragraph (1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 310, Sec. 3.   (AB 2765)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.

(a) The eligibility of households shall be determined to the extent permitted by federal law.

(b) In determining eligibility for CalFresh, minimum age requirements other than those that exist under federal law shall not be imposed.

(c) The department shall establish verification policies and procedures for CalFresh applicants and beneficiaries in the event that necessary verification is not provided by the applicant or beneficiary to accompany the application, semiannual report, annual recertification, or any other form or submission that requests verification be provided at the time of submission. These policies and procedures, to the extent permitted by federal law, regulation, guidance, or a waiver thereof, shall require counties to first seek verification from available electronic sources or self-attestation before requesting documentary evidence from the applicant or beneficiary to complete
 required verification or pursuing secondary evidence to verify the necessary information. Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department shall issue an all-county letter or similar instructions no later than January 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 84.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.09.

To the extent permitted by federal law, regulation, or guidance, or a waiver thereof, the department shall exercise the option provided in Section 273.9(c)(19) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations to exclude, for purposes of calculating a household’s income under CalFresh, any type of income that the department excludes when determining eligibility or benefits for cash assistance provided with federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF) funds and medical assistance under Section 1931 of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396u-1).

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 430, Sec. 2.   (AB 42)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.1.

(a) The department shall issue guidance to counties that does all of the following:

(1) Simplifies the verification of dependent care expense deductions necessary to determine a household’s eligibility for, or the benefit level of, CalFresh.

(2) Establishes that dependent care
 expenses shall be considered verified upon receipt of a self-certified statement of monthly dependent care expenses, unless federal law or guidance requires additional documentation.

(3) Prohibits a county human services agency from requesting additional documents to verify dependent care expenses, except when the reported dependent care expenses are questionable as defined in state regulations.

(b) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), until regulations are adopted, the department may implement this section through all-county letters or similar instructions. The department shall adopt regulations implementing this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 85.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.15.

(a) The department shall issue guidance to counties that does both of the following:

(1) Establishes that shelter costs reported by an applicant or recipient on a signed CalFresh application or semiannual report form shall be sufficient for purposes of determining the applicant’s or recipient’s excess shelter costs deduction.

(2) Prohibits a county human services agency from requesting additional documents to verify excess shelter costs, except when the reported shelter costs are questionable.

(b) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section
 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section through all-county letters or similar instructions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 90, Sec. 2.   (AB 494)   Effective July 12, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.2.

(a) There is hereby created the State Utility Assistance Subsidy (SUAS), a state-funded energy assistance program that shall provide energy assistance benefits to eligible CalFresh households so that the households may receive a standard utility allowance to be used to help meet their energy costs, receive information about energy efficiency, and so that some households may experience an increase in federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program benefits, as well as benefit from paperwork reduction.

(b) To the extent required by federal law, the Department of Community Services and Development shall delegate authority to the State Department of Social Services to design, implement, and maintain SUAS as a program
 created exclusively for purposes of this section, similar to the federal Low-Income Home Energy Assistance Program (LIHEAP) (42 U.S.C. Sec. 8621 et seq.).

(c) In designing, implementing, and maintaining the SUAS program, the State Department of Social Services shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide households that do not currently qualify for, nor receive, a standard utility allowance, with a SUAS benefit in an amount and frequency sufficient to meet federal requirements specified in Section 2014(e)(6)(C)(iv) of Title 7 of the United States Code if the household meets either of the following requirements:

(A) The household would become eligible for CalFresh benefits if the standard utility allowance was provided.

(B) The household would receive
 increased benefits if the standard utility allowance was provided.

(2) Provide the SUAS benefit without requiring the applicant or recipient to provide additional paperwork or verification.

(3) Deliver the SUAS benefit using the Electronic Benefit Transfer (EBT) system.

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, notification of a recipient’s impending EBT dormant account status shall not be required when the remaining balance in a recipient’s account at the time the account becomes inactive is equal to or less than the value of one year of SUAS benefits.

(5) Ensure that receipt of the SUAS benefit pursuant to this section does not adversely affect a CalFresh recipient household’s eligibility, reduce a household’s CalFresh benefits, or disqualify the applicant
 or recipient of CalFresh benefits from receiving other public benefits, including other utility benefits, for which it may qualify.

(d) (1) To the extent permitted by federal law, a CalFresh household that receives SUAS benefits in the month of application for new cases or in the previous 12 months for existing cases is entitled to use the full standard utility allowance for the purposes of calculating CalFresh benefits. A CalFresh household shall be entitled to use the full standard utility allowance regardless of whether the SUAS benefit actually is expended by the household.

(2) If use of the full standard utility allowance, instead of the homeless shelter deduction, results in a lower amount of CalFresh benefits for a homeless household, the homeless household shall be entitled to use the homeless shelter deduction instead of the full standard utility
 allowance.

(e) This section shall not be implemented until funds are appropriated for that purpose by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or related legislation.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 639.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.25.

(a) There is hereby created the Safe Drinking Water Supplemental Benefit Pilot Program, a state-funded program to provide additional CalFresh nutrition benefits for interim assistance to purchase safe drinking water in areas where it is necessary.

(b) The State Department of Social Services shall use moneys allocated for this program to provide time-limited additional state-funded nutrition benefits to residents of prioritized disadvantaged communities that are served by public water systems that consistently fail to meet primary drinking water standards, as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code. Benefits shall be in addition to benefits provided for pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 11450) of Chapter 2 of Part 3, and shall not
 be considered as income for any program established in this code.

(c) The department may use its own existing databases and databases from the State Water Resources Control Board to determine which CalFresh households are eligible to receive benefits pursuant to this section. The following households shall receive priority:

(1) CalFresh recipients served by persistently noncompliant public water systems in disadvantaged communities, as defined in Section 79505.5 of the Water Code, as determined by the location of the recipient’s residence.

(2) CalFresh recipients in communities deemed eligible for interim emergency drinking water benefits by the State Water Resources Control Board, as determined by the recipient’s residence.

(d) Benefits granted
 pursuant to this section shall be delivered through the electronic benefits transfer (EBT) system created pursuant to Sections 10072 and 10072.2.

(e) The benefits authorized pursuant to this section are not entitlement benefits. A county shall comply with this section only to the extent funding for this purpose is appropriated in the annual Budget Act and available to the county. A county shall not be required to expend county funds for the provision of benefits authorized under this section.

(f) This section shall become inoperative upon the expiration of allocated funding for the pilot program or September 30, 2025, whichever is later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 58.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative on or after September 30, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.26.

(a) Subject to an appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act or another statute for this purpose, the department shall administer the CalFresh Minimum Nutrition Benefit (MNB) Pilot Program to provide 12 months of additional state-funded nutrition benefits to ensure eligible households receive a supplement that, when added together with the federal allotment, totals no less than fifty dollars ($50).

(b) (1) The department shall use funds appropriated for the pilot program established in subdivision (a) to provide eligible households a state-funded monthly minimum nutrition benefit that is no less than the difference between the household’s monthly CalFresh allotment and the minimum monthly benefit
 threshold established in subdivision (c).

(2) (A) For purposes of this section, “eligible household” means a household that is approved to receive a federally funded or state-funded monthly CalFresh allotment that is less than the minimum monthly benefit threshold established in subdivision (c) and is identified by the department to participate in the CalFresh MNB Pilot Program.

(B) The department shall retain sole discretion to identify additional eligibility criteria and define the scope of the CalFresh MNB Pilot Program, and shall consult with counties and stakeholders to identify and prioritize populations or regions that have persistently high levels of hunger.

(c) The minimum monthly benefit threshold for this section is fifty dollars ($50).

(d) (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the federal and state laws and regulations governing the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (Chapter 51 (commencing with Section 2011) of Title 7 of the United States Code) shall also govern the program provided for under this section.

(2) Benefits granted pursuant to this section shall be delivered through the electronic benefits transfer (EBT) system created pursuant to Sections 10072 and, to the extent permitted by federal law, shall not be considered income for any means-tested program.

(e) The pilot program established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be implemented on the date that the Statewide Automated Welfare System can perform the automation necessary to implement this section.

(f) Notwithstanding the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the department may implement and administer this section through all-county letters or similar instructions without taking regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 43, Sec. 85.   (AB 120)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.3.

(a) Subject to the limitations of subdivision (b), pursuant to Section 115(d)(1)(A) of Public Law 104-193 (21 U.S.C. Sec. 862a(d)(1)(A)), California opts out of the provisions of Section 115(a)(2) of Public Law 104-193 (21 U.S.C. Sec. 862a(a)(2)). An individual convicted as an adult in state or federal court after December 31, 1997, including any plea of guilty or nolo contendere, of any offense classified as a felony that has as an element the possession, use, or distribution of a controlled substance, as defined in Section 102(6) of the federal Controlled Substances Act (21 U.S.C. Sec. 802(6)) or Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code, shall be eligible to receive CalFresh benefits as provided for under this section.

(b) As a condition of eligibility to receive CalFresh benefits pursuant to subdivision (a), an applicant or recipient described in subdivision (a) who is on probation or parole shall comply with the terms of the probation or parole, including participation in a government-recognized drug treatment program, if required. If the county human services agency receives verification that the individual is in violation of probation or parole or that the individual is a fleeing felon pursuant to federal law, the individual shall be ineligible for CalFresh benefits under this section until the person is no longer in violation of probation or parole or a fleeing felon pursuant to federal law. Verification shall be obtained using existing county human services agency protocols to determine eligibility.

(c) This section shall become operative on April 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 49) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 26, Sec. 50.   (AB 1468)   Effective June 20, 2014.   Section operative April 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18901.35.

(a) (1) No later than September 1, 2022, the department shall issue an all-county letter containing recommendations and suggested methods for county human services agencies to partner with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and county jails to enroll otherwise eligible applicants for the CalFresh program to ensure that an applicant’s benefits may begin as soon as possible upon reentry of the applicant into the community from the state prison or a county jail. 

(2) The all-county letter shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following: 

(A) Information on the benefits of enrolling formerly incarcerated individuals into the CalFresh program.

(B) Information
 on acceptable forms of identification necessary to complete an application for CalFresh benefits, including information on how to verify an applicant’s eligibility for expedited service, as defined in Section 273.2(i)(1) of Title 7 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(C) Information on how to connect individuals released from the state prison with employment or employment opportunities, including how counties may work with the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation to connect individuals to employment opportunities related to any experience, training,
 and education that the individual has obtained, including experience, training, and education obtained while in state prison.

(D) Encourage counties to require county eligibility workers to regularly enter any state prison or county jail within the county to conduct interviews and assist individuals that are within 45 days of release from state prison or county jail with completing applications for CalFresh benefits. This assistance shall be for the purpose of establishing eligibility for CalFresh benefits prior to release from the institution.

(b) If the department deems it necessary to maximize CalFresh enrollment outcomes or employment placement success rates for individuals reentering the community from the state prison or a county jail, the department